Tennessee, session 114, HB1891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-207(f), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (2):
(2) In addition to the submission of the fine and costs in lieu of appearing in
court, a person who is charged with speeding may register for a department-approved
driver education course through the court clerk. Each court clerk shall ensure that
registration for department-approved driver education courses is available online via the
clerk's website. In accordance with § 55-8-207, if the person successfully completes the
course within ninety (90) days of the conviction, the person shall have the points
charged to the person's driving record for the speeding conviction removed; provided,
that five (5) points is the maximum number of points that may be removed from the
person's driving record.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1891
011221
- 1 -